Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-328
Assistance; application; furnish with reasonable promptness.

All individuals desiring to make an application for any type of public assistance shall have an opportunity to do so, and public assistance shall be furnished with reasonable promptness to all eligible individuals.

Laws 1951, c. 210, § 1, p. 772;

Laws 1965, c. 399, § 3, p. 1281.